Hawaii statutes.
§486-82 Nonscheduled inspection,
permissible. Any authorized inspector may, where probable cause exists,
require the driver or custodian of a passenger car to move the passenger car to
a designated place for inspection of the car or its odometer system. [L 1988, c
156, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next